District of Columbia statutes.
42-3171.04

Assistance to displaced persons.

If an occupant or tenant is displaced by the acquisition, development, redevelopment, or disposition of an abandoned or deteriorated property under this subchapter, the Mayor shall offer to the owner or tenant assistance under § 6-331.01; § 6-333.01; or § 6-333.02.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 434
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468